test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-even_gt-desc.ana.yaml
  Noun - álbmotbálkkašupmi: # UPMI
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Nom: álbmotbálkkašupmi
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Gen: álbmotbálkkašumi
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: álbmotbálkkašume
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: álbmotbálkkašupmáme
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Ill: álbmotbálkkašupmái
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: álbmotbálkkašupmii
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: álbmotbálkkašumiinan
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: álbmotbálkkašumiinam
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: álbmotbálkkašumiideameguin
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: álbmotbálkkašumiineameguin


  Noun - leaŋggat: # BUVSSAT
    leaŋggat+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: leaŋga-
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: leaŋggaideameguin
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: leaŋggaideameguin
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: leaŋggaineameguin
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: leaŋggaheapme
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [leaŋggahin, leaŋggaheapmi]


  Noun - sushi: # ADRENALIN
    sushi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: sushi-
    sushi+N+Sg+Nom: sushi
    sushi+N+Sg+Gen: sushi
    sushi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sushime
    sushi+N+Sg+Ill: sushii
    sushi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: sushiinan
    sushi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: sushiinam
    sushi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: sushiideameguin
    sushi+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: sushiineameguin
    sushi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: sushiheapme
    sushi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [sushihin, sushiheapmi]

  Noun - blues: # BUFFALO
    blues+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: [bluesa-, blues-]
    blues+N+Sg+Gen: [bluesa, blues]
    blues+N+Sg+Gen: [bluesa, blues]
    blues+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bluesame
    blues+N+Sg+Ill: bluesii
    blues+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bluesainan
    blues+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: bluesainam
    blues+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bluesaideameguin
    blues+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: bluesaineameguin
    blues+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: bluesažiin
    blues+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: bluesažiinna
    blues+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bluesaheapme
    blues+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [bluesahin, bluesaheapmi]

  Noun - boradankafea: # ESSAYA
    boradankafea+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: boradankafea-
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen: boradankafea
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen: boradankafea
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: boradankafeame
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Ill: [boradankafeii, boradankafeai]
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: boradankafeainan
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: boradankafeainam
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: boradankafeaideameguin
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: boradankafeaineameguin
    boradankafea+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: boradankafeažiin
    boradankafea+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: boradankafeažiinna
    boradankafea+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: boradankafeaheapme
    boradankafea+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [boradankafeahin, boradankafeaheapmi]

  Noun - dáruidahttináigumuš: # LEXMUSH
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: dáruidahttináigumuš-
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Nom: dáruidahttináigumuš
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Gen: dáruidahttináigumuša
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Ill: dáruidahttináigumuššii
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: dáruidahttináigumuššai
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: dáruidahttináigumušainan
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1: dáruidahttináigumušainan
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: dáruidahttináigumušainam
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: dáruidahttináigumušainam
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: dáruidahttináigumušaideameguin
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: dáruidahttináigumušaideameguin
